Washington statutes.
RCW 4.16.130

Action for relief not otherwise provided for.

An action for relief not hereinbefore provided for, shall be commenced within two years after the cause of action shall have accrued.

[Code 1881 s 33; 1877 p 9 s 32; 1854 p 364 s 7; RRS s 165.]

NOTES:

Limitation of action to recover taxes paid: RCW 84.68.060.